bezhta_verb.lexd
PATTERNS
AvarBorrowings [<cvb>:] ConjClitics?
Light [<cvb>:] ConjClitics?
Rogative
PresentForms_h (Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr] | Converb[prs,h] | Converb[since,h])? (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
PresentForms_s (Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr] | Converb[prs,s] | Converb[since,s])? (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
ImperativeForms_h Mood[rog]? (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
ImperativeForms_s Mood[rog]? (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?

Stem_h TAM_h | NonFiniteInfl_h  (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
Stem_s TAM_s (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?

Stem_h Valency? Modal (Past[h] (Converb[pfv,h] | Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr])?) | (Present[h] (Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr] | Converb[prs,h])?)
Stem_s Valency? Modal (Past[s] (Converb[pfv,s] | Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr])?) | (Present[s] (Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr] | Converb[prs,s])?)

Stem_h Causative[l] (Past[l,h] | Past[c,h] (Converb[pfv,h] | Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr] | (Masdar[pst] ([<obl>:ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)?) )?) | (Present[c,h] (Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr] | Converb[prs,h])?) | Caus_h (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
Stem_h Causative[ll] (Past[v,h] (Converb[pfv,h] | Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr] | (Masdar[pst] ([<obl>:ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)?))?) | (Present[v,h] (Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr] | Converb[prs,h])?) | Caus_h (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
Stem_s Causative[l] (Past[l,s] | Past[c,s] (Converb[pfv,s] | Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr]) | (Masdar[pst] ([<obl>:ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)?)?) | (Present[c,s] (Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr] | Converb[prs,s])?) | Caus_s (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
Stem_s Causative[ll] (Past[v,s] (Converb[pfv,s] | Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr]) | (Masdar[pst] ([<obl>:ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)?)?) | (Present[v,s] (Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr] | Converb[prs,s])?) | Caus_s (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?

Aux (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
DoInfl (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?

VerbRoot(1)[h,-cl] VerbRoot(2)[h,-cl] [<v>:] Antipassive[h] VerbNumber[h]?  Present[v,h] | TAM_h | NonFiniteInfl_h  (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
VerbRoot(1)[s,-cl] VerbRoot(2)[s,-cl] [<v>:] Antipassive[s] VerbNumber[s]?  Present[v,s] | TAM_s  (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
VerbRoot(1)[h,-cl] VerbRoot(2)[h,-cl] [<v>:] VerbNumber[h]  Present[v,h] | TAM_h | NonFiniteInfl_h  (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
VerbRoot(1)[s,-cl] VerbRoot(2)[s,-cl] [<v>:] VerbNumber[s]  Present[v,s] | TAM_s (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?

Class VerbRoot(1)[h,cl] VerbRoot(2)[h,cl] [<v>:] Antipassive[h]  Present[v,h] | TAM_h | NonFiniteInfl_h  (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,cl] VerbRoot(2)[h,cl] [<v>:] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]  Present[v,h] | TAM_h | NonFiniteInfl_h  (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
Class VerbRoot(1)[s,cl] VerbRoot(2)[s,cl] [<v>:] Antipassive[s]  Present[s,h] | TAM_s (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,cl] VerbRoot(2)[s,cl] [<v>:] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]  Present[v,s] | TAM_s (Quotative? (ConjClitics | PartClitics)?)?

PATTERN DoInfl
(Class DoRoot[inf]) | (ClassPl DoRoot[pl] [<pl>:]) [<v>:] (Infinitive[h] (Mood[dub] | Participle[fut] | Converb[inf])?) | Mood[imp,а]
Class DoRoot[t] | DoRoot[inf] [<v>:] Present[v,h] | Past[v,h]
Class DoRoot[nfin] | DoRoot[val] [<v>:] Negation[cvb] | NonFiniteInfl_h | Participle[prs,h,-obl] | (Participle[obl] (Infl | LocativeInflection))
ClassPl DoRoot[pl] [<v>:] NonFiniteInfl_h | Participle[prs,h,-obl] | Present[c,h] | Past[c,h]

PATTERN Valency
Causative[l]
Causative[ll] 

PATTERN Stem_h
VerbRoot(1)[h,-cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,-cl] [<v>:] 
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,cl] [<v>:] 
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[h,cl] [<v>:] 
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,cl] [<v>:] 
VerbRootInf(1)[h] ClassInfix[h] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRootInf(2)[h] [<v>:] 

PATTERN Stem_s
VerbRoot(1)[s,-cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,-cl] [<v>:] 
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,cl] [<v>:] 
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[s,cl] [<v>:] 
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,cl] [<v>:] 
VerbRootInf(1)[s] ClassInfix[s] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRootInf(2)[s] [<v>:] 

PATTERN TAM_h
Past[h] > Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr]
Negation[neg,h]? Mood[cond] > ([<invc>:л] | [<cnc>:на])
Participle[prs,h]
Past[h] Converb[pfv,h] 
Past[h] Masdar[pst] ([<obl>:ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)?
Masdar[st]
Infinitive[h] > Mood[dub]
Future[h] > Mood[hyp]
Plusquamperfect[h]
Mood[proh]
Mood[opt.neg]
Infinitive[h] Participle[fut]
Infinitive[h] Converb[inf]
Infinitive[h] Converb[goal]
Participle[pst,obl] Infl | LocativeInflection
# negation
Negation[pst,h] > (Masdar[pst] ([<obl>:ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)?)
Negation[prs,h] > Converb[prs,h]
Negation[neg,h] Present[h] Converb[prs,h] > Converb[since,h]
Negation[cvb]
Negation[imp,h]
Negation[neg] Participle[prs,h]
Mood[prmIII,h]

PATTERN Caus_h
Negation[neg,h]? Mood[cond] > ([<invc>:л] | [<cnc>:на])
Participle[prs,h]
Masdar[st]
Infinitive[h] > Mood[dub]
Future[h] > Mood[hyp]
Plusquamperfect[h]
Mood[proh]
Mood[opt.neg]
Infinitive[h] Participle[fut]
Infinitive[h] Converb[inf]
Infinitive[h] Converb[goal]
Participle[pst,obl] Infl | LocativeInflection
# negation
Negation[pst,h] > (Masdar[pst] ([<obl>:ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)?)
Negation[prs,h] > Converb[prs,h]
Negation[neg,h] Present[h] Converb[prs,h] > Converb[since,h]
Negation[cvb]
Negation[imp,h]
Negation[neg] Participle[prs,h]
Converb[pfv,h]
Converb[simul,h] | Converb[ant,h]
Converb[how,h] > Converb[why,h]
Converb[after,h] | (Converb[before,h] > Translative)
Converb[place,h] > (Translative | Lative | Ablative)
Converb[before,h] Negation[loc] Translative
Masdar[st]
Mood[prmIII,h]

PATTERN NonFiniteInfl_h
Converb[pfv,h]
Converb[simul,h] | Converb[ant,h]
Converb[how,h] > Converb[why,h]
Converb[after,h] | (Converb[before,h] > Translative)
Converb[place,h] > (Translative | Lative | Ablative)
Converb[before,h] Negation[loc] Translative
Masdar[st]

PATTERN TAM_s
Past[s] > Mood[hyp] | Mood[irr]
Negation[neg,s]? Mood[cond] > ([<invc>:л] | [<cnc>:на])
Participle[prs,s]
Converb[pfv,s]
Converb[simul,s] | Converb[ant,s]
Converb[how,s] > Converb[why,s]
Past[s] Converb[pfv,s] 
Past[s] Masdar[pst] ([<obl>:ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)?
Masdar[st]
Infinitive[s] > Mood[dub]
Future[s] > Mood[hyp]
Plusquamperfect[s]
Mood[proh]
Mood[opt.neg]
Infinitive[s] Participle[fut]
Infinitive[s] Converb[inf]
Converb[after,s] | (Converb[before,s] > Translative)
Converb[place,s] > (Translative | Lative | Ablative)
Converb[goal]
Mood[prmIII,s]
Masdar[st]
# negation
Negation[pst,s] > (Masdar[pst] ([<obl>:ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)?)
Negation[prs,s] > Converb[prs,s]
Negation[neg,s] Present[s] Converb[prs,s] > Converb[since,s]
Negation[cvb]
Negation[imp,s]
Negation[neg] Participle[prs,s]
Converb[before,s] Negation[loc] Translative

PATTERN Caus_s
Negation[neg,s]? Mood[cond] > ([<invc>:л] | [<cnc>:на])
Participle[prs,s]
Converb[pfv,s]
Converb[simul,s] | Converb[ant,s]
Converb[how,s] > Converb[why,s]
Masdar[st]
Infinitive[s] > Mood[dub]
Future[s] > Mood[hyp]
Plusquamperfect[s]
Mood[proh]
Mood[opt.neg]
Infinitive[s] Participle[fut]
Infinitive[s] Converb[inf]
Mood[prmIII,s]
Converb[after,s] | (Converb[before,s] > Translative)
Converb[place,s] > (Translative | Lative | Ablative)
Converb[goal]
Masdar[st]
# negation
Negation[pst,s] > (Masdar[pst] ([<obl>:ла] Infl | LocativeInflection)?)
Negation[prs,s] > Converb[prs,s]
Negation[neg,s] Present[s] Converb[prs,s] > Converb[since,s]
Negation[cvb]
Negation[imp,s]
Negation[neg] Participle[prs,s]
Converb[before,s] Negation[loc] Translative

PATTERN PresentForms_h
# stems without umlaut
VerbRoot(1)[h,v,-cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,-cl,v] [<v>:] Present[h,v]
VerbRoot(1)[h,c,-cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,-cl,c] [<v>:] Present[h,c]
VerbRoot(1)[h,l,-cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,-cl,l] [<v>:] Present[h,l]

# gender-agreeing
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,v,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,v] [<v>:] Present[h,v]
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,v,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,v] [<v>:] Present[h,v]
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,c,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,c] [<v>:] Present[h,c]
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,c,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,c] [<v>:] Present[h,c]
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,l,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,l] [<v>:] Present[h,l]
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,l,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,l] [<v>:] Present[h,l]

VerbRootInf(1)[h,v] ClassInfix[h] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRootInf(2)[h,v] [<v>:] Present[h,v]
VerbRootInf(1)[h,c] ClassInfix[h] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRootInf(2)[h,c] [<v>:] Present[h,c]
VerbRootInf(1)[h,l] ClassInfix[h] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRootInf(2)[h,l] [<v>:] Present[h,l]

PATTERN PresentForms_s
# stems with umlaut
VerbRoot(1)[s,v,-cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,-cl,v] [<v>:] Present[s,v]
VerbRoot(1)[s,c,-cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,-cl,c] [<v>:] Present[s,c]
VerbRoot(1)[s,l,-cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,-cl,l] [<v>:] Present[s,l]
# gender-agreeing with umlaut
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,v,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,v] [<v>:] Present[s,v]
Class VerbRoot(1)[s,v,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,v] [<v>:] Present[s,v]
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,c,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,c] [<v>:] Present[s,c]
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,c,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,c] [<v>:] Present[s,c]
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,l,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,l] [<v>:] Present[s,l]
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,l,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,l] [<v>:] Present[s,l]

VerbRootInf(1)[s,v] ClassInfix[s] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRootInf(2)[s,v] [<v>:] Present[s,v]
VerbRootInf(1)[s,c] ClassInfix[s] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRootInf(2)[s,c] [<v>:] Present[s,c]
VerbRootInf(1)[s,l] ClassInfix[s] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRootInf(2)[s,l] [<v>:] Present[s,l]

PATTERN Permissive_h
Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ]

PATTERN Permissive_s
Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ]

PATTERN ImperativeForms_h
VerbRoot(1)[h,а,-cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,-cl,а] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,а](Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ])? 
VerbRoot(1)[h,0,-cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,-cl,0] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,0] ([:а] Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ])? 
VerbRoot(1)[h,и,-cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,-cl,и] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,и]
# gender-agreeing
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,а,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,а] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,а](Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ])? 
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,а,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,а] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,а] (Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ])? 
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,0,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,0] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,0] ([:а] Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ])? 
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,0,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,0] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,0] ([:а] Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ])? 
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,и,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,и] [<v>:]   (Mood[imp,h,и] | ([<imp>:] [:а] Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ]))
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[h,и,cl] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[h,cl,и] [<v>:]   (Mood[imp,h,и] | ([<imp>:] [:а] Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ]))

VerbRootInf(1)[h,а] ClassInfix[h] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRootInf(2)[h,а] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,а](Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ])?
VerbRootInf(1)[h,0] ClassInfix[h] Antipassive[h]? VerbNumber[h]? VerbRootInf(2)[h,0] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,0](Mood[prmI,h] > [<prmII>:ъ])?
